Washington statutes.
RCW 43.135.045

Education construction fund—Appropriation conditions.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1468-S.SL) ***

The education construction fund is hereby created in the state treasury.

(1) Funds may be appropriated from the education construction fund exclusively for common school construction or higher education construction.

(2) Funds may be appropriated for any other purpose only if approved by a two-thirds vote of each house of the legislature and if approved by a vote of the people at the next general election. An appropriation approved by the people under this subsection must result in an adjustment to the state expenditure limit only for the fiscal period for which the appropriation is made and does not affect any subsequent fiscal period.

(3) Nothwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, during the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the fund may be used for maintenance and operations at community and technical colleges.

[ 2016 sp.s. c 36 s 934; 2013 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 5. Prior: 2012 2nd sp.s. c 5 s 1; 2012 1st sp.s. c 10 s 5; 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 950; 2010 1st sp.s. c 27 s 5; prior: 2009 c 564 s 939; 2009 c 479 s 37; prior: 2007 c 520 s 6035; 2007 c 484 s 5; prior: 2005 c 518 s 931; (2005 c 488 s 920 expired June 30, 2007); 2005 c 314 s 401; 2005 c 72 s 6; 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 920; prior: (2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 919 expired June 30, 2005); (2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 918 expired June 30, 2005); (2002 c 33 s 2 expired June 30, 2003); prior: 2001 c 3 s 9 (Initiative Measure No. 728, approved November 7, 2000); 2000 2nd sp.s. c 5 s 1; 2000 2nd sp.s. c 2 s 3; 1994 c 2 s 3 (Initiative Measure No. 601, approved November 2, 1993).]

NOTES:

Effective date—2016 sp.s. c 36: See note following RCW 18.20.430.

Intent—Effective dates—2013 2nd sp.s. c 9: See notes following RCW 28A.150.220.

Effective date—2012 2nd sp.s. c 5: "Sections 1 and 3 through 12 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and take effect July 1, 2012." [ 2012 2nd sp.s. c 5 s 14.]

Purpose—Construction—2012 1st sp.s. c 10: See note following RCW 84.52.0531.

Effective dates—2011 1st sp.s. c 50: See note following RCW 15.76.115.

Findings—Intent—2010 1st sp.s. c 27: See note following RCW 28B.76.526.

Effective date—2009 c 564: See note following RCW 2.68.020.

Effective date—2009 c 479: See note following RCW 2.56.030.

Part headings not law—Severability—Effective dates—2007 c 520: See notes following RCW 43.19.125.

Contingent effective date—2007 c 484 ss 2-8: See note following RCW 43.79.495.

Effective date—2005 c 518 s 931: "Section 931 (RCW 43.135.045) of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect June 30, 2005." [ 2005 c 518 s 1808.]

Expiration date—2005 c 488 ss 920 and 921: "Sections 920 and 921 of this act expire June 30, 2007." [ 2005 c 488 s 955.]

Part headings not law—Severability—Effective dates—2005 c 488: See notes following RCW 28B.50.360.

Effective date—2005 c 314 ss 101-107, 109, 303-309, and 401: See note following RCW 46.68.290.

Part headings not law—2005 c 314: See note following RCW 46.68.035.

Findings—Effective dates—2005 c 72: See notes following RCW 43.135.025.

Expiration date—2003 1st sp.s. c 26: "Sections 918 through 921, 926, and 929 of this act expire June 30, 2005." [ 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 927.]

Severability—2003 1st sp.s. c 26: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 930.]

Effective dates—2003 1st sp.s. c 26: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [June 26, 2003], except for section 919 of this act which takes effect June 30, 2003." [ 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 931.]

Severability—Effective date—2003 1st sp.s. c 25: See notes following RCW 19.28.351.

Expiration date—2002 c 33: "This act expires June 30, 2003." [ 2002 c 33 s 3.]

Effective date—2002 c 33: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [March 13, 2002]." [ 2002 c 33 s 4.]

Short title—Purpose—Intent—Construction—Effective dates—2001 c 3 (Initiative Measure No. 728): See notes following RCW 67.70.240.

Effective date—2000 2nd sp.s. c 2: See note following RCW 43.135.025.